North Carolina, session 2025, HB410.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The North Carolina Institute of Medicine shall study the advantages
and disadvantages of legalizing medical aid in dying (MAID) in North Carolina. The study shall
include an evaluation of at least all of the following:
(1) In the 11 United States jurisdictions that have legalized MAID (current MAID
states), the process by which a person applies and receives approval for
MAID, including applicant qualifications and safeguards.
(2) The factors that contribute most to a person's decision to seek MAID.
(3) The characteristics and demographic backgrounds of persons who seek
MAID.
*H410-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(4) The social and emotional impacts on a person's family members when MAID
is available to a person as an alternative to an extended dying process.
(5) Which medications have been or are currently being used for MAID, and
whether intravenous self-administration would be an improvement over
self-ingestion through the gastrointestinal tract.
(6) The best options for healthcare providers to opt out of participating in MAID.
(7) Available data from the current MAID states that are reporting on conclusions
arising from the legalization of MAID, particularly with respect to the
effectiveness of MAID laws in providing an end-of-life option.
(8) What end-of-life options are currently available in North Carolina and
recommendations about whether MAID is an advisable additional alternative.
(9) To what extent the absence of MAID in North Carolina and other states
increases the chance that a terminally ill person will choose to commit suicide
by violent or other means.
(10) Developments in MAID legislation since Oregon's 1997 Death with Dignity
Act and recommendations about what safeguards are essential to ensure that
only mentally competent, terminally ill persons are seeking MAID and that
they are seeking MAID without coercion or undue pressure; and, by contrast,
which current safeguards have become redundant and are no longer needed.
(11) Using data from current MAID states, the number of people who would likely
utilize MAID if it became legal in North Carolina.
(12) In current MAID states, whether there are indications that individuals have
been coerced into using MAID.
(13) In current MAID states, the implementation impact of MAID on healthcare
systems, institutions, and providers.
(14) In current MAID states, the impact of MAID on awareness or utilization of
hospice and palliative care as an alternative to MAID.
(15) The reasons why approximately one-third of the persons who apply for and
receive MAID drugs decide not to take them, including whether there are
psychological benefits to having MAID as a legal option even if people
ultimately decide against using or even applying for MAID.
(16) The percentage of eligible terminally ill, mentally competent persons in each
United States jurisdiction where MAID is legal who do, in fact, avail
themselves of this law.
(17) Any other areas the Department deems relevant or helpful to determining
whether to legalize MAID in North Carolina.
SECTION 1.(b) The North Carolina Institute of Medicine (NCIOM) shall, prior to
submitting the report required by subsection (c) of this section, conduct at least one public hearing
to ensure the general public has an opportunity to provide the NCIOM with comments regarding
the advantages and disadvantages of legalizing MAID in North Carolina. The NCIOM shall
provide at least 15 days' advance notice of a public hearing conducted pursuant to this subsection.
All interested persons shall be heard at the public hearing.
SECTION 1.(c) By April 1, 2027, the North Carolina Institute of Medicine shall
report its findings and any recommendations with respect to legalizing MAID in North Carolina,
including any recommendations regarding proposed legislation, to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Department of Health and Human
Services.
SECTION 2. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Health and Human Services the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars
($150,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the North
Carolina Institute of Medicine to fund the study authorized by Section 1 of this act.
Page 2 House Bill 410-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 410-First Edition Page 3